Nebraska, session 109, LB963.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB963 LB963
2026 2026
Section 1. (1) The Legislature finds and declares that:
(a) State agencies and state officials entering into agreements to
enforce immigration law or to investigate, interrogate, detain, detect,
or arrest persons for immigration enforcement purposes pursuant to such
agreement is a matter of statewide concern;
(b) The public is entitled to receive notice and have an opportunity
to be heard concerning such agreements; and
(c) Such agreements should only be authorized when they have been
approved by the Legislature.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a)(i) Immigration enforcement agreement means an agreement,
contract, lease, or memorandum of understanding between a state agency
and any other public entity, pursuant to which the state agency will
enforce immigration law or investigate, interrogate, detain, detect, or
arrest persons for immigration enforcement purposes.
(ii) Immigration enforcement agreement does not include an agreement
between a state agency and a public entity, including the United States
Department of Homeland Security, relating to investigating violations of
laws prohibiting human trafficking or enforcing such laws; and
(b) Public entity means the United States; any state, county, or
municipality; and any branch, subdivision, board, commission, department,
agency, or other instrumentality of such entities.
(3) A state agency or official shall not enter into any immigration
enforcement agreement without first receiving approval from the
Legislature. Any immigration enforcement agreement that has not been
approved by the Legislature is void and unenforceable.
(4) Any immigration agreement entered into by a state agency or
official prior to the effective date of this act is void and
unenforceable.
Sec. 2. Section 83-170, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
-2-

LB963 LB963
2026 2026
83-170 As used in the Nebraska Treatment and Corrections Act, unless
the context otherwise requires:
(1) Board means the Board of Parole;
(2) Committed offender means any person who, under any provision of
the laws of this state law, is sentenced or committed to a facility
operated by the department or is sentenced or committed to the department
other than a person adjudged to be as described in subdivision (1), (2),
(3)(b), or (4) of section 43-247 by a juvenile court;
(3) Department means the Department of Correctional Services;
(4) Director means the Director of Correctional Services;
(5) Facility means any prison, reformatory, training school,
reception center, community guidance center, group home, or other
institution operated by the department;
(6) Good time means any reduction of sentence granted pursuant to
sections 83-1,107 and 83-1,108;
(7) Maximum term means the maximum sentence provided by law or the
maximum sentence imposed by a court, whichever is shorter;
(8) Minimum term means the minimum sentence provided by law or the
minimum sentence imposed by a court, whichever is longer;
(9) Pardon authority means the power to remit fines and forfeitures
and to grant respites, reprieves, pardons, or commutations;
(10) Parole term means the time from release on parole to the
completion of the maximum term, reduced by good time;
(11) Person committed to the department means any person sentenced
or committed to a facility within the department;
(12) Restrictive housing means conditions of confinement that
provide limited contact with other offenders, strictly controlled
movement while out of cell, and out-of-cell time of less than twenty-four
hours per week; and
(13) Solitary confinement means the status of confinement of an
inmate in an individual cell having solid, soundproof doors and which
-3-

LB963 LB963
2026 2026
deprives the inmate of all visual and auditory contact with other
persons.
Sec. 3. Section 83-176, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-176 (1) Whenever any person is sentenced or committed under any
provision of the laws of this state law to a specific facility within the
department or to the custody of the warden or superintendent of such
facility, he or she shall be deemed to be sentenced or committed to the
department.
(2) The director may designate as a place of confinement of a person
committed to the department any available, suitable, and appropriate
residence facility or institution, whether or not operated by the state,
and may at any time transfer such person from one place of confinement to
another.
Sec. 4. Original section 83-176, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and section 83-170, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, are
repealed.
-4-